Oklahoma, session 2026, HB4286.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 920 of Title 36, unless there is
created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. An insurer shall not use credit information or a credit-
based insurance score as any part of a decision to deny, cancel,
nonrenew a personal insurance policy, or to set policy rates.
B. Nothing in this act shall be construed to restrict any
insurer from obtaining or using its own payment history information

Req. No. 14113 Page 1

or i nformation contained in an insurance claims history report or
any other non-credit based report.
SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 36 O.S. 2021, Section 3623.1, as
amended by Section 4, Chapter 154, O.S.L. 2022 (36 O.S. Supp. 2025,
Section 3623.1), is amended to read as follows:
Section 3623.1. A. Nothing in this Code shall be construed to
prevent an insurer from charging and collecting in this state
separate initial membership fees, policy fees and any other fees as
defined in subsection C of this section in addition to premiums for
insurance, and such fees shall not be considered premium within the
definition of this Code, but shall be subject to premium tax as
provided in this Code. An insurer shall fully disclose all fees to
its customers.
B. A minimum premium charge is considered premium within the
definition of this Code, and shall be subject to premium tax as
provided in this Code.
C. 1. Fees are defined as a flat amount added to the basic
premium rate to reflect the cost of establishing the required
records, sending premium notices and other related expenses and
include, but are not limited to, the following: Installment fees,
service charges, financing fees, membership fees, return check fees,
policy fees, motor vehicle record fees, inspection fees, late fees,
electronic transfer fees, credit score fees and expense load fees.

Req. No. 14113 Page 2

2. The fee passed on to the consumer must be the actual expense
incurred by the insurance company, insurance agency or insurance
producer.
D. Minimum premium charge is the smallest acceptable premium
for which an insurance company will write a policy. This minimum
charge is necessary to cover fixed expenses, other than those
expenses defined as fees above, in placing the policy on the books.
A minimum premium charge includes, but is not limited to, minimum
earned premium and minimum retained premium.
E. An insurance producer, limited lines producer, managing
general agent, or surplus lines insurance broker cannot charge a
duplicate fee or minimum premium charge.
SECTION 3. REPEALER 36 O.S. 2021, Section 953, is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 4. REPEALER 36 O.S. 2021, Section 953.1, is
hereby repealed.
SECTION 5. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.

60-2-14113 MJ 01/14/26





Req. No. 14113 Page 3